Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-415
Effect of previous declaration.

An instrument executed anywhere before July 15, 1992, which substantially complies with subsection (1) of section 20-404 shall be effective under the Rights of the Terminally Ill Act.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 15.